Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 6. Financial Provisions.

Sec. 42.40.500.
Limitation of liability.

A liability incurred by the corporation shall be satisfied exclusively from the assets or revenue of the corporation and no creditor or other person has a right of action against the state because of a debt, obligation, or liability of the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.510.
Fidelity bond.

The corporation shall obtain a fidelity bond in an amount determined by the board for board members and each executive officer responsible for accounts and finances.
A bond must be in effect during the entire tenure in office of the bonded person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.520.
Insurance.

Except as provided in AS

42.40.310(b)

, the corporation shall protect its assets, services, and employees by purchasing insurance or providing for certain self-insurance retentions. The corporation shall also maintain casualty, property, business interruption, marine, boiler and machinery, pollution liability, and other insurance in amounts reasonably calculated to cover potential claims against the corporation or state for bodily injury, death or disability and property damage that may arise from or be related to corporation operations and activities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.530.
Revenue.

Revenue generated by or appropriated to the corporation shall be retained and managed by the corporation for railroad and related purposes in accordance with 45 U.S.C. 1207(a)(5) (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982).

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.540.
Appropriations.

The corporation may request, with the concurrence of the governor, a direct appropriation or grant from the legislature to assist in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)